ja: 互換性のあるタムパッドマウント: クランプマウント; Lロッドマウント; ラックマウント; シェルマウント; スタンドマウント; ユニバーサル; その他
sl-SI: Združljiv nosilec za tom bobne: Pritrditev s spono; Pritrditev z L-palico; Pritrditev na stojalo; Pritrditev na ogrodje; Pritrditev na stojalo; Univerzalno; Drugo
sk-SK: Montáž kompatibilných tom padov: Upevnenie pomocou svorky; Upevnenie typu L-rod; Upevnenie na rampu; Upevnenie na korpus; Upevnenie na stojan; Univerzálne; Iné
nb: Kompatibel montering av tammepad: Klemmefeste; L-stangfeste; Stativfeste; Skallfeste; Stativfeste; Universell; Annet
ko: 호환 탐 패드 장착 방식: 클램프 마운트; L-로드 마운트; 랙 마운트; 셸 마운트; 스탠드 마운트; 범용; 기타
zh-TW: 相容的嗵鼓打擊墊安裝方式: 夾具安裝; L 型桿安裝; 機架安裝; 鼓身安裝; 支架安裝; 通用; 其他
zh-CN: 适配探鱼器安装方式: 夹持安装; L 型杆安装; 支架安装; 鼓壳安装; 鼓架安装; 通用; 其他
pt-BR: Suporte compatível para tom pad: Montagem com abraçadeira; Montagem em haste L; Montagem em rack; Montagem no casco; Montagem em estante; Universal; Outro
el: Συμβατή βάση/σύστημα τοποθέτησης ταμπούρου tom: Βάση σφιγκτήρα; Βάση L-rod; Βάση rack; Βάση περιβλήματος; Βάση σε ορθοστάτη; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
lt-LT: Suderinamas tom pado montavimas: Tvirtinimas spaustuku; L formos strypo tvirtinimas; Rėminis tvirtinimas; Tvirtinimas prie korpuso; Tvirtinimas prie stovo; Universalus; Kita
pl: Kompatybilne mocowanie pada tom-tomu: Montaż na klamrę (clamp); Montaż na L-rod; Montaż na ramie (rack); Montaż na korpusie; Montaż na statywie; Uniwersalne; Inne
it: Montaggio compatibile per tom pad: Montaggio a morsetto; Montaggio con asta a L; Montaggio a rack; Montaggio sul fusto; Montaggio su supporto; Universale; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместим монтаж на том-пад: Монтаж със скоба; Монтаж с L-образна стойка; Монтаж на рак; Монтаж на корпуса (Shell mount); Монтаж на стойка; Универсален; Друг
cs: Kompatibilní montáž padů tomů: Uchycení na svorku; Uchycení na L-držák; Uchycení na rampu; Uchycení na korpus; Uchycení na stojan; Univerzální; Jiné
de: Kompatible Tompad-Halterung: Klemmhalterung; L-Stangen-Halterung; Rack-Halterung; Kesselhalterung; Stativhalterung; Universal; Sonstige
da: Kompatibel montering af trommepude: Klemmebeslag; L-rod-beslag; Rackbeslag; Kedelbeslag; Stativbeslag; Universal; Andet
pt-PT: Suporte compatível para tone pad: Montagem com braçadeira; Montagem com haste em L; Montagem em rack; Montagem no casco; Montagem em suporte; Universal; Outra
fi: Yhteensopiva tomipadikiinnitys: Puristinkiinnitys; L-tankokiinnitys; Telinekiinnitys; Runkokiinnitys; Jalustakiinnitys; Universaali; Muu
en: Compatible tom pad mounting: Clamp mount; L-rod mount; Rack mount; Shell mount; Stand mount; Universal; Other
ro-RO: Montare compatibilă cu pad de tom: Montură cu clemă; Montură tip L-rod; Montură pe rack; Montură pe corp (shell); Montură pe stativ; Universal; Altele
th: การติดตั้งแผ่นรองทอมที่เข้ากันได้: แบบใช้แคลมป์หนีบ; แบบใช้ก้านตัวแอล; แบบยึดกับแร็ค; แบบยึดกับตัวถัง (Shell); แบบตั้งขาตั้ง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
es: Soporte compatible para almohadilla de tom: Montaje de abrazadera; Montaje de barra en L; Montaje en bastidor; Montaje en cuerpo; Montaje en soporte; Universal; Otro
hu: A TomTom készülékkel kompatibilis tartó: Bilincses rögzítés; L-száras rögzítés; Állványos rögzítés; Dobtestre szerelhető; Állványra szerelhető; Univerzális; Egyéb
vi: Giá đỡ trống tom điện tử tương thích: Ngàm kẹp; Ngàm chữ L; Ngàm vào giá; Ngàm vào thùng trống; Ngàm vào chân đế; Đa năng; Khác
sv: Kompatibelt monteringsfäste för pukpad: Klämfäste; L-stångsfäste; Rackfäste; Trumstomfäste; Stativfäste; Universell; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilno montiranje tom padova: Montaža sa stezaljkom; Montaža na L-šipku; Montaža na stalak (rack); Montaža na tijelo (shell); Montaža na klasični stalak; Univerzalno; Ostalo
nl: Compatibele tompadbevestiging: Klembevestiging; L-vormige stangbevestiging; Rekbevestiging; Ketelbevestiging; Statiefbevestiging; Universeel; Overige
ru: Совместимое крепление том-пэда: Крепление на зажим; Крепление на L-образный стержень; Крепление на раму; Крепление на корпус; Крепление на стойку; Универсальный; Другое
tr: Uyumlu tom pedi montajı: Kelepçe montajı; L çubuk montajı; Rack montajı; Gövde montajı; Sehpa montajı; Evrensel; Diğer
fr: Fixation compatible de tom électronique: Fixation par pince; Fixation sur tige en L; Fixation sur rack; Fixation sur fût; Fixation sur pied; Universel; Autre